Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1528
Successive executions or orders of sale; when authorized.

Successive executions or orders of sale may issue at any time after the return of the officer not sold for want of bidders at the request of the plaintiff or his attorney.

R.S.1867, Code § 495, p. 477;

R.S.1913, § 8073;

Laws 1915, c. 149, § 2, p. 319;

C.S.1922, § 9010;

C.S.1929, § 20-1528;

R.S.1943, § 25-1528.

Amendatory act of 1915 was not unconstitutional; appraisement is no longer prerequisite to sale of land under execution of foreclosure decree. Conservative Savings & Loan Assn. of Omaha v. Anderson, 116 Neb. 627, 218 N.W. 423 (1928).